dictsource/qu_rules
// Translation rules for Quechuan
// This file is UTF-8 encoded


.replace
       ʼ       '     // replace modified apostrophe to simple apostrophe

.group a
       a       a

.group b
       b       b

.group c
       ch      tS
       chh     tSh
       ch'     tS`?

.group c
       c       ts

.group d
       d       d

.group e
       e       e

.group f
       f       f

.group g
       g       g

.group h
       h       h

.group i
       i       i

.group y
       y       j

.group j
       j       h

.group k
       k       k
       kh      kh
       k'      k`?

.group l
       l       l
       ll      l^

.group m
       m       m

.group n
       n       n

.group ñ
       ñ       n^

.group o
       o       o

.group p
       p       p
       ph      ph
       p'      p`?

.group q
       q       q
       qh      qh
       q'      q`?

.group r
       r       R

.group s
       s       s

.group t
       t       t
       th      th
       t'      t`?

.group u
       u       u

.group v
       v       v

.group w
       w       w

.group x
       x       ks

.group z
       z       z
